Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8209
Total capital and surplus requirements; director; powers; letter of credit requirements.

(1) No captive insurer shall be permitted to transact any business in this state unless it maintains total capital and surplus in the amount of at least one hundred thousand dollars in such form as is acceptable to the director.

(2) Upon a written finding by the director that the approved plan of operation or the operational results of the captive insurer require either additional capital or a larger surplus than required by this section, the director may require that additional capital or surplus, or both, be obtained. Additional capital or surplus may be tendered in the form of an irrevocable evergreen letter of credit acceptable to the director.

(3) Any letter of credit provided to satisfy the requirements of the Captive Insurers Act shall be:

(a) Jointly held under the control of the director and the captive insurer for the benefit of claimants;

(b) Issued or confirmed by an institution that is insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation;

(c) The sole property of such captive insurer; and

(d) Free and clear of any claim or encumbrance.

Laws 2007, LB117, § 43.